Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 General Provisions

38-2-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Military Forces Reorganization Act of 1955.”

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 2.

Cross references.

Georgia Military Pension Fund, T. 47, C. 24, A. 1.

38-2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Active military service of the United States” and “in the armed forces of the United States” mean full-time duty in the army, navy, marine corps, air force, or coast guard of the United States.

“Active service” and “active duty” mean military duty in or with a force of the organized militia (not including the inactive National Guard) or in the Military Division, Department of Defense, either in a full-time status or in a part-time status, depending upon the conditions under which the duty is performed.

“Military” and “military and naval” mean army or land, air force or air, and navy or naval.

“Military” or “military or naval” means army or land, air force or air, or navy or naval.

“Military service of the state,” as to military personnel, means service in or with a force of the organized militia or in the Military Division, Department of Defense.

“National Guard” means the Georgia National Guard, the composition of which is set forth in Code Section 38-2-3.

“Naval Militia” means the Georgia Naval Militia as may be organized hereafter.

“Officer” or “commissioned officer” includes warrant officers.

“On the active list” means on the rolls of a force of the organized militia, not including the inactive National Guard.

“Organized militia,” “all or any part of the organized militia,” “organized militia or any part thereof,” “any force of the organized militia,” and “organized militia or any force thereof” mean, severally, the Army National Guard, the Air National Guard, the Georgia Naval Militia, when organized, and the State Defense Force, when organized, and include any unit, component, element, headquarters, staff, or cadre thereof as well as any member or members.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, commas were inserted before and after both instances of “when organized” in paragraph (10).

38-2-3.
Division and composition of militia; membership of unorganized militia.

The militia of the state shall be divided into the organized militia, the state reserve list, the state retired list, and the unorganized militia.

The organized militia shall be composed of:

An Army National Guard and an Air National Guard which forces, together with an inactive National Guard, when such is authorized by the laws of the United States and regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall comprise the Georgia National Guard;

The Georgia Naval Militia whenever such a state force shall be duly organized; and

The State Defense Force whenever such a state force shall be duly organized.

The state reserve list and the state retired list shall include the persons who are lawfully carried thereon and such persons as may be transferred thereto or placed thereon by the Governor in accordance with this chapter.

Subject to such exemptions from military duty as are created by the laws of the United States, the unorganized militia shall consist of all able-bodied male residents of the state between the ages of 17 and 45 who are not serving in any force of the organized militia or who are not on the state reserve list or the state retired list and who are, or who have declared their intention to become, citizens of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, §§ 1, 3, 4; Code 1933, §§ 86-201, 86-209, 86-301, 86-401; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

38-2-4.
Persons exempted from militia duty; exception.

Persons within this state who are not citizens thereof and resident aliens shall not be liable to militia duty, except in repelling local invasions or suppressing insurrections.

History.

Laws 1818, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 367; Code 1863, § 1598; Code 1868, § 1660; Code 1873, § 1665; Code 1882, § 1665; Civil Code 1895, § 1819; Civil Code 1910, § 2176; Code 1933, § 79-306.

Cross references.

Rights of citizens of other states while in Georgia generally, §

1-2-9

.

Rights of aliens while in Georgia generally, §

1-2-11

.

38-2-5.
Federal call up of militia; Governor’s duties; utilization of unorganized militia; effect of unit’s absence.

When the militia of the state is called into federal service under the Constitution and laws of the United States, the Governor shall order out for service the organized militia or such part thereof as may be necessary; and, if the number available is insufficient, the Governor may call for and accept from the unorganized militia as many volunteers as are required for service in the organized militia. During the absence of the organized militia in the service of the United States, their state designations shall not be given to new organizations.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 6.

38-2-6.
Ordering organized militia into active state service; Governor’s duties; local officials’ duties; declaration of state of emergency; pay.

The Governor shall have power, in case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force or violence, or imminent danger thereof, or other grave emergency, to order all or any part of the organized militia into the active service of the state for such period, to such extent, and in such manner as he may deem necessary. Such power shall include the power to order the organized militia or any part thereof to function under the operational control of the United States army, navy, or air force commander in charge of the defense of any area within the state which is invaded or attacked or is or may be threatened with invasion or attack.

Whenever any judge of a superior, city, or state court, sheriff, or mayor of a municipality shall apprehend the outbreak of insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, or combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force or violence within the jurisdiction of which such officer is by law the conservator of the peace, or in the event of disaster or other grave emergency, it shall be the duty of the judge, sheriff, or mayor, when it appears that the unlawful combination or disaster has progressed beyond the control of the civil authorities, to notify the Governor, and the Governor may then, in his discretion, if he deems the apprehension well founded or the disaster or emergency of sufficient magnitude, order into the active service of the state for such period, to such extent, and in such manner as he may deem necessary all or any part of the organized militia.

When the Governor orders into the active service of the state all or any portion of the organized militia as provided in this Code section, he shall declare a state of emergency in such locality and it shall be the duty of the Governor to confirm such declaration and order in writing which shall state the area into which the force of the organized militia has been ordered.

The compensation of all officers and enlisted men while on duty or assembled pursuant to this Code section shall be paid in the manner prescribed by Code Section 38-2-250.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-207, 86-1302; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-27.

Cross references.

Governor’s role as commander-in-chief of state militia, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. III.

Further provisions regarding emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

, 45-12-29 et seq.

Further powers of Governor as to calling out of militia, §§ 45-12-27, 45-12-28, 45-12-31.

38-2-6.1.
Request by Governor for members to report for active duty without first having declared an emergency.

The Governor is authorized and empowered to request individual members of the Georgia National Guard, with their consent, to report for duty into the active service of the state for the performance of any official duty in connection with National Guard activities without first having declared an emergency as provided for in Code Section 38-2-6 or 45-12-30; provided, however, that when requested to report for duty into the active service of the state, members of the organized militia may not be deployed to quell riots, insurrections, or a gross breach of the peace or to maintain order until an emergency has first been declared as provided in Code Section 38-2-6 or 45-12-30.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 654, § 1.

38-2-6.2.
[Repealed] National Guard Olympic support activities; reciprocal aid agreements or compacts with other states.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-6.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1018, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1018, § 1, effective September 1, 1996.

38-2-7.
Declaration of martial rule; area encompassed specifically designated.

Whenever any portion of the organized militia is employed pursuant to Code Section 38-2-6, the Governor, if in his judgment the maintenance of law and order will thereby be promoted, may declare by proclamation the area in which the troops are serving, or any specified portion thereof, to be under martial rule. The proclamation shall define the area which is under martial rule.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 8.

38-2-8.
State reserve list; composition; active duty; length of service computations; applicable rules and regulations.

Any commissioned or warrant officer of the organized militia may be transferred to the state reserve list on his own request, if approved by the adjutant general.

Any commissioned or warrant officer of the organized militia whose assignment becomes excess personnel by reduction, disbandment, or reorganization of a unit or by denial, withdrawal, or termination of his federal recognition or for any other reason, unless transferred to the inactive National Guard, may be relieved from duty or command and may be transferred to the state reserve list.

Any person who has served as a commissioned or warrant officer in the organized militia or in the armed forces of the United States and has been honorably discharged therefrom may be commissioned and placed on the state reserve list in the highest grade previously held by him after complying with such conditions as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

Upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, the Governor may order any person on the state reserve list to active duty in or with the organized militia for a period not to exceed three months, in which case the person shall rank in his grade from the date of such order.

Time spent on the state reserve list shall not be credited in the computation of length of service for seniority, pay, promotion, or otherwise, or retirement or any of the privileges and exemptions pertaining thereto, except that time served on active duty by order of the Governor shall be so credited.

The provisions of this chapter relative to the resignation, retirement, court-martial, dismissal, or discharge of commissioned or warrant officers of the organized militia, including dismissal or discharge on the findings of an efficiency or medical examining board, shall be applicable to commissioned or warrant officers on the state reserve list.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-405; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 14.

38-2-9.
State retired list; officers; enlisted persons; grade upon transfer to list; return to active duty; computation of time.

Any member of the organized militia who has reached the age of 64 years may be retired for the reason of age and transferred to the state retired list by the Governor. A member may be retired for reason of age and transferred to the state retired list by the Governor before reaching 64 years of age in order to conform to the laws and regulations of the United States which are applicable to the organized militia.

Any officer who has served for at least 20 years in the organized militia or in the organized militia and the armed forces of the United States combined, upon his request, may be transferred to the state retired list by the Governor in a grade which is one grade higher than the highest grade previously held by him during such service. In computing the 20 year period, service as an enlisted person shall be counted.

Any warrant officer or enlisted person who has served for at least 20 years in the organized militia or in the organized militia and the armed forces of the United States combined, upon his request, may be transferred to the state retired list by the Governor in a grade equivalent to the highest grade held by him during such service. If the grade was of officer grade, subsection (b) of this Code section will govern.

Upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, the Governor may order any person on the state retired list to return to active duty and serve on military courts or boards, perform staff duty in or with the organized militia, or, in time of emergency, perform any military duty in or with the organized militia. In any such case, the person so ordered shall rank in his grade at retirement from the date of the order.

Time spent on the state retired list shall not be credited in the computation of length of service for seniority, pay, promotion, or otherwise, or any of the privileges and exemptions pertaining thereto, except that time served on active duty by order of the Governor shall be credited.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 213, § 4/SB 258.

Cross references.

Credit for service in organized militia for purposes of Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, §

47-2-90

.

38-2-10.
Use of National Guard in drug law enforcement, provision of medical care in medically underserved areas, and for youth opportunity training programs.

In addition to any other authority provided by the Constitution and laws of this state, the Governor, as commander-in-chief of the organized militia of this state and in accordance with 32 U.S.C. Section 112, may:

Authorize or direct the Georgia National Guard to assist and support federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies in drug interdiction, counterdrug activities, and drug demand reduction;

Order or direct that properly licensed medical personnel of the Georgia National Guard provide medical care to civilians in medically underserved areas of this state under such terms and conditions as the Governor, in consultation with the commissioner of public health, shall determine appropriate, subject to any applicable laws and regulations of the United States; or

Order or direct that the Georgia National Guard apply for and use federal funds to provide training, education, and other benefits to civilians in accordance with any federal laws or regulations authorizing National Guard participation.

Whenever the Governor assigns duty to the adjutant general under this Code section, the adjutant general shall have the authority:

To provide assistance to federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies upon request, including the use of military equipment and facilities, transportation, surveillance, drug seizure and destruction, language translation, and such other assistance as may be necessary and within the authority of the requesting law enforcement agency; provided, however, that where federal equipment is to be used, the adjutant general shall verify that the federal government has made such equipment available for use by the state; provided, further, that National Guard members involved in such activities are subject to the directions of the requesting law enforcement agency through the National Guard chain of command;

To consult with appropriate state agencies concerning youth opportunity training programs and, in connection therewith, to establish a program utilizing National Guard facilities, the National Guard, and Department of Defense personnel to provide military-based training and other benefits to civilian youth pursuant to agreement with the federal government or otherwise;

To establish a drug demand reduction program in which National Guard personnel and their families participate in programs designed to discourage drug use; and

To provide medical care in medically underserved areas in accordance with directions of the Governor.

To enter into agreements and do all things necessary or incidental to the performance of any such duty authorized in paragraph (1) of this subsection, including the execution of memoranda of agreement for assistance to federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies, the execution of grant agreements with the federal government, and the execution of other contracts and agreements.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 655, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

38-2-11.
Implementation of federally approved counterdrug law enforcement plans.

The Governor may request National Guard assistance, including but not limited to, personnel, supplies, and equipment, from the governor of another state for the purpose of implementing a federally approved counterdrug law enforcement plan under 32 U.S.C. Section 112. Such National Guard personnel from another state while performing duty in this state pursuant to a request made under this Code section shall have the same immunity from liability and prosecution as do National Guard personnel of this state performing such duty.

The Governor may authorize the use of Georgia National Guard personnel and equipment outside the boundaries of the state under this Code section, if:

A request is received from the governor of another state;

The request evidences that the requesting governor has authority to make the request;

The attorney general of the requesting state has acknowledged the Governor’s authority and has certified that National Guard personnel requested from this state while performing duty in the requesting state shall have the same immunity from liability and prosecution as do National Guard personnel of the requesting state performing such duty; and

The request relates to the performance of duty in a federally approved counterdrug law enforcement plan as authorized and funded under 32 U.S.C. Section 112.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 655, § 1.

38-2-12.
Use of National Guard as honor guards for veterans’ funerals.

Subject to the appropriation by the General Assembly of funds for such purpose, the Governor may authorize or direct Georgia National Guard personnel to serve while on state active duty as honor guard detail for veterans’ funerals on appropriate occasions. The adjutant general shall request reimbursement for the pay and allowances due to such members ordered to such duty.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 237, § 1.